Washington statutes.
RCW 35.73.070

Improvement district bonds—Payment—Remedies.

The bonds or warrants shall be payable only from the fund created by the special assessments upon the property in the local improvement district, and the owner of any bond or warrant shall look only to this fund for the payment of the principal and interest thereof and shall have no claim or lien therefor against the city by which the same was issued except from that fund.

[ 1983 c 167 s 63; 1965 c 7 s 35.73.070. Prior: 1915 c 87 s 1, part; 1907 c 243 s 5, part; RRS s 9430, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.